Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 260.057 is amended to read:
260.057. (1) The Secretary of State by rule  shall adopt an electronic filing system to be used by:
(a) All candidates and political committees to file with the secretary  statements of contributions
received  and  expenditures made by the candidates and political committees, as described in ORS
260.083.
(b) Treasurers of petition committees organized under ORS 260.118 to file with  the secretary
statements of contributions received  and expenditures made by the treasurers or chief petitioners
as described in ORS 260.083.
(c) Persons who make independent expenditures as provided in ORS 260.044 to file with the
secretary statements of independent expenditures made by the  persons as described in ORS 260.083.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a candidate or  political committee shall file a
statement of contributions received and  expenditures made described in subsection (1)(a) of this
section not later than 30 calendar days after a contribution is received or an expenditure is made.
(3)(a) A candidate for nomination or election at  any primary or general election or a political
committee supporting or opposing a  candidate or measure at any primary or general election shall
file a statement described  in subsection (1)(a) of this section not later than seven calendar days after
a contribution is received or an expenditure is made. This paragraph applies  to contributions re-
ceived and expenditures made:
(A) During the period beginning  on the 42nd calendar day before the date of any primary
election and ending on the date of the primary election; and
(B) During the period beginning  on the 42nd calendar day before the date of any general
election and ending on the date of the general election.
(b) For any special election, the secretary by rule may  establish a period during which a can-
didate for nomination or election at the special election or a political committee supporting  or op-
posing a candidate or measure at the special election must file a statement described  in subsection
(1) of this section not later than seven calendar days after a contribution is received or an expend-
iture is made.
(c) If the candidate or political committee receives a  contribution or makes an expenditure prior
to the 42nd calendar day before the date of the primary or general election and the  candidate or
political committee has not filed a statement of the contribution or expenditure under subsection (2)
Enrolled Senate Bill 224 (SB 224-A) Page 1
of this section by the 43rd calendar  day before the date of the primary or general election, the
candidate or political committee shall file a statement described in subsection  (1)(a) of this section
not later than whichever of the following dates occurs first:
(A) The date required under subsection (2) of this section; or
(B) The 35th calendar day before the date of the primary or general election.
(4) The electronic filing system shall be provided free of charge by the secretary and shall:
(a) Accept electronic files that conform to the format prescribed by the secretary by rule; or
(b) Be compatible with any other electronic filing application provided  or approved by the sec-
retary.
(5)(a) Except as provided in paragraph  (b) or (c)  of this subsection, the secretary shall make all
data filed electronically under subsection (1)(a) of  this section and all information filed with the
secretary under ORS  260.049 or 260.085 available on the Internet to the public free of charge ac-
cording to a  schedule adopted by the secretary by rule. The secretary shall make the data available
in a searchable database that is easily accessible by the  public. When the secretary makes data or
information available on the Internet under this subsection, the secretary shall display any  con-
tribution received from a person or political committee with an out-of-state  address in a different
colored font than a contribution received from a person or political committee  with an in-state ad-
dress.
(b) The secretary may not make data that are filed  electronically under subsection (1)(a) of this
section available to the public under this section, unless the data are required to be  listed under
ORS 260.083. The secretary may not disclose under ORS 192.311 to 192.478 any data that are filed
electronically under subsection (1)(a) of this section, unless the  data are required to be listed under
ORS 260.083.
(c) The secretary may not make the  residence address of any individual who is associated
with a candidate’s principal campaign committee, as designated under ORS 260.041, a political
committee organized under ORS 260.042 or a  petition committee organized under ORS 260.118
available to the public on the electronic filing system adopted under this section unless the
individual directs the secretary to disclose the address of that individual. A residence address
described under this paragraph is a public record subject to inspection under ORS 192.314.
(6) Each statement required by this section shall  be signed and certified as true by the candi-
date, treasurer, designee of the candidate or treasurer or  person who files a statement of inde-
pendent expenditures under ORS  260.044, as appropriate. Signatures shall be supplied in the manner
specified by the secretary by rule.
(7) This section does not apply to:
(a) Candidates for federal office;
(b) Candidates who are not required to file a statement of organization under ORS 260.043; or
(c) Candidates, political committees  or petition committees that file certificates under ORS
260.112.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 260.057 by  section 1 of this 2025 Act become oper-
ative on January 1, 2027.
Enrolled Senate Bill 224 (SB 224-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate April 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 224 (SB 224-A) Page 3